src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
!
! 0-IPFV-STAT
!
! 0-IPFV-STAT and 0-PFV-STAT share the exact same inflectional markers, and
! differ only in aspect (imperfective vs. perfective).  They are also both
! identical to 0-IPFV except in 3PL and 4SG forms when no other prefixes
! appear before the stem, where an irregular high tone (a reflex of the
! historical *ñ- perfective prefix that appears in stative verbs) is present:
!
! 0-IPFV-STAT:
!   O ágílá     "they are doing/making O" (3PL gí-, not *gi-)
!   O áts'ílá   "someone is making/doing O" (4SG ts'í-, not *ts'i-)
!   O ágiyìlá   "they are doing/making it" (3PL gi-, not *gí-, since yì-
!                [3SG.DOBJ, transitional transitive] appears between gi-
!                and the stem)
!
! 0-PFV-STAT:
!   O ágílàg    "they did/made O" (3PL gí-, not *gi-)
!   O áts'ílàg  "someone did/made O" (4SG ts'í-, not *ts'i-)
!   O ágiyìlàg  "they did/made it" (3PL gi-, not *gí-, since yì- [3SG.DOBJ,
!                transitional transitive] appears between gi- and the stem)
!
! (Both also appear with gù-, rather than gu-, with areal subjects, as in
!  ágùná "it will happen" (0-IPFV-STAT) and ágùjàg "it happened" (0-PFV-STAT).
!  Since areal subjects aren't a predictable part of all 0-IPFV/PFV
!  paradigms, we treat them as a separate derivation in the cases where they
!  occur, and therefore not needing to be modelled as part of the inflection
!  here)
!
! As the above examples illustrate, while the names "0-IPFV-STAT" and
! "0-PFV-STAT" suggest that verbs belonging to these paradigm classes are
! stative, this often isn't the case synchronically in Tsuut'ina:
!
!   (a) A number of high-frequency active verbs (e.g., "make/do") take
!       0-IPFV-STAT inflection; and
!
!   (a) In many other Dene languages, cognates of Tsuut'ina ilí(n) "be"
!       take the equivalent of 0-IPFV-STAT inflection (cf. Southern Tutchone
!       nlį "he/she/it is", with n- being the reflex of Proto-Dene *ñ-).  In
!       Tsuut'ina, ilí(n) "be" takes 0-IPFV/yi-y-PFV inflection, with only 
!       the areal subject form gúlí(n) "there is/are" appearing with an
!       irregular high tone on gu- that is a final, suprasegmental remnant
!       of the stative verb paradigm that this used to belong to.
!
! Given the amount of overlap between 0-IPFV and 0-IPFV-STAT, we reuse the
! TAMA chunk definitions in 0-IPFV-AFF, using flag diacritics to override 3PL
! and 4SG forms as needed.
!
LEXICON 0-IPFV-STAT
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.%0-STAT@              0-IPFV-AFF ;


!
! ni-IPFV
!
! There are two major variants of ni-IPFV:
!
!   1. One in which 3SG, 3PL, and 4SG forms are accompanied by a high tone
!      after an inner or middle prefix (e.g., ch'àdít'a "he/she/it is holy",
!      ch'àgidít'a "they both are holy", ch'àts'idít'a "someone is holy",
!      with dí-, rather than *di-).
!
!   2. Another in which 3SG, 3PL, and 4SG forms are accompanied by a mid tone
!      after an inner or middle prefix (e.g., ts'ilo "he/she/it is lazy",
!      ts'igilo "they both are lazy", ts'its'ilo "someone is lazy", with
!      3SG ts'i- rather than *ts'í-, 3PL gi- rather than *gí-, 4SG ts'i-
!      rather than *ts'í-)
!
! Besides the tonal differences in these specific forms, the two variants are
! identical.  Since the first of these two variants (with high tone) is by far
! the more common one, we treat it as the default when @U.TAMA.ni@ is
! specified, and use the additional flag @U.NITONE.MID@ to handle cases where
! the second variant (with mid tone) is needed, requiring that flag to be set
! in the lexical entries for verb phrases that take that inflection.
!      
LEXICON ni-IPFV
@U.ASPECT.IPFV@@U.TAMA.ni@                   ni-IPFV-AFF ;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          ni-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   ni-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    ni-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           nis-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    nis-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     nis-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           nii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    nii-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     nii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis                      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní                       #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ni                       #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2                     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                         #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                         #;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.NITONE.MID@                      ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix-Forms;
@D.NITONE@                          ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix-Forms;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix-Forms
! Three forms of 2SG ni-IPFV after an inner prefix are attested and freely
! interchangeable: ní-, níni-, and íni- (e.g., ch'àdinít'a ~ ch'àdinínit'a ~
! ch'àdiínit'a "you (sg.) are holy", after inner prefix di-; cf. TLQ-20210510).
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis                      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní                       #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níni                     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@iíni                     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.NITONE.MID@           #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.NITONE@í              #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2                     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@R.NITONE.MID@           #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@D.NITONE@í              #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.NITONE.MID@           #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.NITONE@í              #;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
! Three different classes of middle prefixes are shunted into this contlex,
! each of which show slightly different morphological behaviour in ni-IPFV:
!
!   1. Forms that include ^L, whether as part of their lexical make-up (e.g.,
!      átłàyidìʔò "close it (solid obj.)") or introduced inflectionally (e.g.,
!      with transitional transitives, where ^L accompanies any direct object
!      inflection that is marked on the verb, as in nàyìʔò "put it down (solid
!      obj.)").  These use the same TAMA forms as ni-IPFV after an outer
!      prefix.
!
!   2. The indefinite direct object prefix i_ (when not accompanied by ^L as
!      part of a transitional transitive).  This takes its own distinctive set
!      of TAMA forms.
!
!   3. All other middle prefixes (e.g., lexical ts'i_ in ts'ilo "he/she/it is
!      lazy", lexical gu_ in mágunishó "I know it", inflectional 3PL subject
!      gi_ in gítsìtł'a "they both are small").  These use the same TAMA forms
!      as ni-IPFV after an inner prefix.
!
! TODO: In theory, other definite object prefixes could end up as part of that
! third class of middle prefixes, too, but all ni-IPFV (and ni-PFV) transitive
! verbs appear to be transitional transitives.  In the future, it might make
! sense to capture that observation in the TAMA chunk definitions for ni-IPFV
! and ni-PFV (and 0-STAT) directly, rather than as a separate argument struct-
! ure class (assuming we don't need transitional transitive to capture any
! instances of transitional transitive ^L that crop up in PROG, REP, or POT
! forms; we would need to look into those in more detail to find out).
@R.LOWTONE.ON@                              ni-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix;
@D.LOWTONE@@D.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT@          ni-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;
@D.LOWTONE@@R.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@@R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ ni-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-Indef;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-Indef
! Indefinite direct objects in ni-IPFV have only 2SG ní- (e.g., moghaaníʔò "you
! (sg.) hand something to him/her/it (solid obj.)"), with high tone in
! 3SG/3PL/4SG forms (e.g., yoghaáʔò "he/she/it hands something to him/her/it
! (solid obj.), giyoghaáʔò "they both hand something to him/her/it (solid
! obj.), moghaats'íʔò "someone hands something to him/her/it (solid obj.)).
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@í     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@í     #;

LEXICON ni-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@      #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@      #;


LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ís    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.NITONE.MID@                     nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix-Forms;
@D.NITONE@                         nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix-Forms;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix-Forms
! Three forms of 2SG nis-IPFV after an inner prefix are attested and freely
! interchangeable: nís-, nínis-, and ínis- (e.g., diníssúl ~ dinínisúl ~
! diínisúl "you (sg.) are hairy")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis                      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís                      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nínis                    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@iínis                    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.NITONE.MID@s          #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.NITONE@ís             #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2                     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@R.NITONE.MID@s          #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@D.NITONE@ís             #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.NITONE.MID@s          #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.NITONE@ís             #;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@R.LOWTONE.ON@                              nis-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix;
@D.LOWTONE@@D.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT@          nis-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;
@D.LOWTONE@@R.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@@R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ nis-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-Indef;
